src/phonology/sme-phon.twolc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!!                   !!! North Sámi morphophonological rule set                  
! ========================================================================== !

! twol-sme.txt
!! The file contains the rule set for the non-segmental
!! North Sámi morphophonological rules

!! Note that when copied over to newinfra, this file will be labeled sme-phon-L1.twolc.
!! The file sme-phon-L1.twolc will __not__ be the source file to edit, 
!! rather, the source file will be this file, gt/sme/src/twol-sme.txt. This file (in the old infra)
!! is the ordinary sme fst file to be edited.
!! The L2 sme fst, on the other hand, will have lags/sme/src/phonology/sme-phon-L2.twolc
!! as its sourcefile, the file to be edited.

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q   ! small
 r s t u v w x y z å ä ö ø æ %-
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q   ! capital
 R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö Ø Æ
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

! Morphophonemes


u6:u

e7:e h7:h i7:i o7:o u7:u æ7:æ 

g8:g h8:h m8:m n8:n 

  ! the x8 ones are consonants that alternate in stem-final positions.

b9:b d9:d e9:e g9:g h9:h j9:j k9:k m9:m n9:n o9:o p9:p r9:r s9:s t9:t z9:z æ9:æ š9:š ž9:ž 

! The x9 consonants  never alternate.

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

 č đ ŋ š ŧ ž          ! Sámi letters.
 Č Đ Ŋ Š Ŧ Ž          !

 %/
 º:0  !! {{º}} is for CnsGrad of the {{lg:lgg}} and {{lºl:ll}} type
 ¤:0  !! {{¤:0}} prevents ConsGrad in certain words
 ':'  !! {{'}} is the real apostroph


 X1:0 X2:0 X3:0 X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0   ! diacritics
 Q1:0 Q2:0 Q3:0 Q4:0 Q5:0 Q6:0 Q7:0 Q8:0 Q9:0   ! They trigger morphophono-
 Y1:0 Y2:0 Y3:0 Y4:0 Y5:0 Y6:0 Y7:0 Y8:0 Y9:0   ! logical rules
 W1:0 W2:0 W3:0 W4:0 W5:0 W6:0 W7:0 W8:0 W9:0
 

 %^DISIMP:0

! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefx
 %> ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
 ∑ ! Used in front of # for dynamic compounds.

 ! Escaped chars
 %  

! End of alphabet definitions
;

Sets
  Vow = a á e e7 e9 i i7 o o7 o9 u u6 u7 y æ æ7 ø å ä ö
        A Á E       I    O     U    Y Æ    Ø Å Ä Ö
!        O9
        é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý
        É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý ;
  Cns = b b9 c č d đ d9 f g g8 g9 h h8 h9 j j9 k k9 l m m8 m9 n ŋ n8 n9
        B C Č D Đ F G H J K L M N Ŋ
!        B9 D9 G8 G9 H8 H9 J9 K9 M8 M9 N8 N9 P9 Z9 
        p p9 r s š t ŧ v w z ž z9 º '
        P R S Š T Ŧ V W Z Ž ;
  StemCns = b b9 d d9 g g8 g9 h h8 h9 j j9 l m m8 m9 n n8 n9 r s š
            B D G H J L M N R S Š 
!            B9 D9 G8 G9 H8 H9 J9 M8 M9 N8 N9 
            ;
  WeG = X4 X5 X6 X8 X9 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 W1 W4 W5 W7 %^DISIMP ;
  Len = Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y9 ¤ ;
  Dummy = X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 Q9 %^DISIMP
          Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 W1 W2 W3 W4 W5 W6 W7 W8 W9 ¤ %> %^ » ;
  FinalDummy = X2 X4 X7 X8 %> %^ » ;         ! This set is not in use !!
  NonMPDummy = X1 X4 X7 X8 ¤ %> %^ » ;
  NonMPDummy2 = X1 X4 ¤ %> %^ » ;
  HighVow = i i7 u u7 I U ;
  NonHighVow = a e e7 e9 o7 o9 o A E O ;
  Stop = k p t c č K P T C Č ;
  DelCns = g8 m8 n8 h8 
!  G8 M8 N8 H8 
	;
  CntrCns = s j h ž S J H Ž ;
  Hyph = %- ;


Definitions

! G3  = Vow Cns Cns Cns Vow ;
! G2  = Vow Cns Cns Vow ;
! G1  = Vow Cns Vow ;
! G12 = G1 | G2 ;

! The G1 gang

! The G2 gang

! The G3 gang
! đºđ fºf lºl hlºl mºm nºn nºnj ŋºŋ rºr hrºr sºs šºš ŧºŧ vºv
! bm dn dnj gŋ
! hcc hčč hpp hkk htt ddj
! llj
! bb dd gg zz žž
! rºbm rºdn rºdnj ºrgŋ
!đºb, đºb, đºj, đºv, iºb, iºc, iºd, iºf, iºg, iºk, iºl, iºhl, iºhm, iºhn, iºp, iºr, iºs, iºt, iºv, iºz,
!lºb, lºc, lºč, lºd, lºf, lºg, lºj, lºk, lºp, lºs, lºš, lºt, lºv, lºž, mºb, mºp, mºs, mºš, nºc, nºč, nºd,
!nºs, nºt, nºz, nºž, ŋºg, ŋºk, rºb, rºc, rºč, rºd, rºf, rºg, rºj, rºk, rºp, rºs, rºš, rºt, rºv, rºz, rºž,
!sºk, sºm, sºp, sºt, šºk, šºm, šºt, šºv, tºk, tºm, vºd, vºg, vºj, vºk, vºl, vºhl, vºp, vºr, vºt, vºz, vºž
!đºbm dºgŋ iºbm iºdn iºgŋ lºbm lºdn lºgŋ vºdn vºdnj
!iºsk iºst mºšk nºsk nºst rºsk rºst vºsk
!kºc kºč kºs kºst kºš kºt

! G3 = Cns: Cns: Cns (Cns) | b m | d n | g ŋ | b b | d d | g g | z z | ž ž |

! Intuition:
! Have the => rule work in case of (upper or lower or both?) G3.
! Have the <=> rule work in al

! Define G12: Here we have <=>
! Define G3 (or not): Here (i.e. elsewhere) we have =>.

!Defining G1, G2, G3.
!Auxiliary definitions
G1  = Cns | h [l|r] | n j ;

!UCns = Cns: ;
!RLCns = :Cns;
!RealCns = UCns:LCns - º:0 ;
RealCns    = Cns - º:0 ;
all2Cns    = Cns Cns ;
real2CnsG3 =  b: m | d: n | g: ŋ | b: b: | d: d: | g: g: | z: z: | ž: ž: ; ! This could be the problem
2CnsG2     = all2Cns - real2CnsG3 ;
3CnsG2     = Cns RealCns Cns ; !!!!!!!!!!!!!!                        ! đºb:đbb, đºg:đgg, ...
fake8CnsG3 = Cns: º: Cns ;                                          ! đºb:đ0b
3CnsG3     = h [ c c | č č | p p | k k | t t ] | [ d d | l l ] j  ;

!G2  = 2CnsG2 | 3CnsG2 ;
! 2CnsG2 is well-defined, 3CnsG2 is not. :-(

!G3  = fake8CnsG3 | real2CnsG3 | 3CnsG3 ;
!G3  = fake8CnsG3 ; !err
!G3  = real2CnsG3 ; !err
!G3  = 3CnsG3 ;     !err
! => All 3 parts of the G3 definition are flawed

!G12 = G1 | G2 ;                        ! This is what we waht
G12 = G1 | 2CnsG2 ; ! testing G2 parts  ! This we do while waiting for 3CnsG2.
! The second part of the G2 definitions is flawed.

! Pseudocode (see "Going for 2" below)
! Diphthongsimpl <=> _ G12 i j: ;
! OptDiphtsimpli  => _ G3  i j: ;








! ============ !
! Rule section !
! ============ !



Rules

! Introduction to the set of testwords (introduced with !!€ and !!$ that are added)
! -------------------------------------------------------------------------------

! (this documentation will be enlarged and moved to the documentation, and a trimmed version
! will be left here)

! For each rule, there is a set of word pairs to test. The words will be extracted into
! two files (the !!€ words for positive tests, the !!$ ones for negative tests, i.e. pairs that
! the parser shall reject.

! Basic usage is: (this paragraph shall be removed, as we want the one in the next paragraph)
! open twolc -utf8. Issue the following commands:
! install-binary bin/twol-sme.bin
! pair-test-file filename (where "filename" is the name of the file containing the test words)

! Usage (this is what we are aiming at):
! In the testing catalogue, issue one of the commands
! make twol-positive
! make twol-negative
! make twol-test (do both)
! This will extract the test pairs from this file, and print a report for each of the tests.
! The reports will be printed to report files named twol-pos.out and twol-neg.out. The reports
! are finally scanned by another script, which gives a warning if anything unexpected was found.

! We may also use other testfiles than the ones generated from this file (twol-sme.txt file).
! make twol-test TYPE=pos FILE=testfile   (when the file contains positive test pairs)
! make twol-test TYPE=neg FILE=testfile   (when the file contains negative test pairs)
! make twol-test FILE=testfile            (the default is TYPE=pos)
! make twol-test HELP                     (prints out these lines)

! The test cases are of two types:
! - positive tests
! - negative tests
!
! Positive tests are such that they require the pairs to match - if not, the rule (or
! another conflicting rule) is broken. These test pairs should be designed to check that
! the rule allways give the wanted mapping.
!
! Positive tests are marked with a € sign (and as a comment, to not infer with the
! regular rule compilation):
!
!!€ ájºgi
!!€ ái0gi
!
! Negative tests are pairs that should NOT match. The pairs should be designed such that
! they are likely but illegal pairs, so as to identify possible holes in the rules. Such
! holes will lead to overgeneration, and spurious acceptance of misspelled words, wrong
! analyses, bad generation, etc. Also, errors in the rules can lead to an inefficient
! analyser.
!
! Negative tests are also very important for regression testing: all bugs found and
! corrected should be added as negative pairs illustrating the bug that was corrected.
! This way, we can always check whether the bugs are still fixed or reintroduced by
! other bug fixes.
!
! Negative tests are marked with a dollar sign:
!
!!$ mánnáX5jd
!!$ má0ná0jd
!
! You may have more than one test word (pair) on each line, that is, you can have several
! pairs after each other on two lines separated by one or more spaces. This will save
! precious vertical space in the file, and make the rule file easer to read.
!
! The result/output is:
! REJECT
! ACCEPT
! Error
! and will be put into a separate test result file. A final script checks that the test
! result is what it should be, and reports the findings (ok/error(s) found).



! ============================ !
! Here begins the rule section !
! ============================ !

! j rule
! ------

"Postvocalic j Surfacing"
! j:i <=>  ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [Vow:|:0] ( %>: ) ( :0 ) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | º: | ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6:)+ (Hyph) ( ∑ ) # ] ; !Thomas #699
  j:i <=>  Vow: ( %>: ) ( :0 ) ( Dummy: )* _ [ Cns | º: | ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6:)+ [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ] ; ! Kept Vow:, but accepted Dummies at length

!!€ ájºgi
!!€ ái0gi

!!€ majdege
!!€ maidege

!!$ almmajX4in
!!$ almmai0in

!!€ mánnáX5jd
!!€ má0ná0id

!!€ almmájX4#
!!€ almmái0#

!!€ almmájX4X7-
!!€ almmái00-

!!€ almmájX4in
!!€ almmáj0in

! Added ( :0 ) because of olmmoš !  new version for Troandin-bisma
! All j:i alternation is conflated into one rule. LC is vowel and optional
! (suffixinitial) dummy symbol, RC is consonant, dummy or word boundary,
! The intention is to have the strict operator (<=>), but catch the
! variation with a lot of (=all) contextual alternatives.
! exchanging DummyNotY5 with :0 - Y5: , better luck this time.

! Word final consonant alternations
! ---------------------------------

! Only alveolar consonants word-finally:

"Word Final Consonant Neutralization 1"  !smirezit : smires, Troandin-bisma
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Dummy:+) _ (º:0 k:0) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6: )( :0 - Y5: - Y6: ) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( »: ( »: »: )) ( ∑ ) # ]  ;
			where Cx in (z m h p g b d)
			      Cy in (s n t t t t t)
			matched ;


"Word Final Consonant Neutralization Ž"
 ž:š <=> Vow: _ (ž:0) [%>:|»: »: »: |%>: [(»:) X7:|X4:|»: X8:|X4: X7:|»: »: »:]] ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
 
"Word Final Consonant Neutralization Ž2"
 ž:š <=> Vow: [%>: Y5:|%>: Q7:|»:|%>] _ ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
 
"Word Final Consonant Neutralization Ž3"
 ž:š <=>  %>: Y5: »: X6: _ (X7:) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;

"Word Final Consonant Neutralization Ž4"
 ž:š <=> Vow: (¤:) (%>:) (»:) X6: _ (X7:) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;

"Word Final Consonant Neutralization Ž5"
 ž:š <=> Vow: _ (ž:0) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;

!%>X6ž
!Testcases for the above rules:
!!€ barggož-
!!€ barggoš-

!!€ smirez-
!!€ smires-

!!€ Troandim#
!!€ Troandin#

!!€ Troandim-
!!€ Troandin-
